Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1721
Sections; purposes.

The purposes of sections 23-1721 to 23-1736 are to guarantee to all citizens a fair and equal opportunity for public service in the office of the county sheriff in counties having a population of twenty-five thousand inhabitants or more, to establish and review conditions of service which will attract officers and employees of character and capacity, and to increase the efficiency of the county sheriff's office by the establishment of a merit system.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 1, p. 642;

Laws 1972, LB 1093, § 1;

Laws 1975, LB 315, § 1;

Laws 1977, LB 122, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 782, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 222, § 1.

The purpose of this act is not to remove from the sheriff the right to discipline his personnel but, rather, to insulate deputy sheriffs from the political hazards which they might encounter upon the election of a new sheriff. Freese and Johnson v. County of Douglas, 210 Neb. 521, 315 N.W.2d 638 (1982).